Louisiana, session 2026, HB519.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:4165(G) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§4165. Special masters; appointment; duties and powers; compensation; code of
judicial conduct
* * *
G. For complex causes of action with multiple cases sharing common
questions of fact, when consolidated pursuant to an order or rules adopted by the
supreme court, any appointment of a special master by a trial court pursuant to this
Section shall comply with the ethical requirements of the Code of Judicial Conduct
as applicable and the requirements of Fed. Civ. R. 53 as to the appointment and
disqualification of a master, except to the extent those requirements are specifically
inconsistent with state law. Any appointment as described in this Subsection shall
also be subject to the provisions of Paragraphs (2) and (6) of Subsection F of this
Section. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the provisions of this
Subsection apply to those complex cases designated or approved under rules adopted
for this purpose by the Louisiana Supreme Court with all appointments under this
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 519 ENROLLED
Subsection complying with those rules and the ethical requirements of this
Subsection.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.